Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-109, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4-109. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall


designate locations where voter registration applications will be


available for distribution. The secretary of each county election


board may, with approval of the Secretary of the State Election


Board, designate additional locations where voter registration


applications will be available for distribution. Preference shall


be given to public libraries, public buildings, grocery stores,


popular private businesses, and other locations where large numbers


of potential voters may be located. Particular emphasis shall be



Req. No. 2897 Page 1


placed on making voter registration applications available for


organized voter registration programs.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2897 BLB 1/15/2026 2:10:04 PM







































Req. No. 2897 Page 2